Tennessee, session 114, SB0873.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. In addition to any funds appropriated by the provisions of this act, there is
appropriated the sum of $20,000,000 (nonrecurring) to the Department of Education, for the
sole purpose of providing school safety grants to LEAs and public charter schools to be used to
provide walk-through detectors and scanners in schools; provided, that if a school already has
walk-through detectors and scanners installed, then the grants may be used for other
prevention, reduction, and response efforts toward school shootings. It is the legislative intent
that such funds be appropriated for the same purpose in this section in fiscal years 2026-2027
and 2027-2028.
SECTION 2. In addition to any funds appropriated by the provisions of this act, there is
appropriated the sum of $4,000,000 (nonrecurring) to the Department of Education, for the sole
purpose of providing school safety grants to non-public schools in the same manner as funds
appropriated in Section 54, Item 1, line item 41 of Chapter 418 of the Public Acts of 2023 to be
to be used to provide walk-through detectors and scanners in schools; provided, that if a school
already has walk-through detectors and scanners installed, then the grants may be used for
other prevention, reduction, and response efforts toward school shootings.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0873
003030
- 1 -